Maine, session 132, LD71.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C,
§50, is further amended by amending subparagraph (15) to read:
(15) In fiscal year 2019-20, 45%; and
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C,
§50, is further amended by amending subparagraph (16) to read:
(16) In fiscal year 2020-21 and succeeding years in each succeeding fiscal year
prior to fiscal year 2025-26, 50%.; and
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C,
§50, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (17) to read:
(17) In fiscal year 2025-26 and succeeding fiscal years, 55%.